Utah statutes.
31A-23a-110.   Form and contents of license.
(1)  A license issued under this chapter shall be in the form the commissioner
prescribes and shall set forth:
(a)  the name and address of the licensee;
(b)  the license types and lines of authority under Section 31A-23a-106;
(c)  the date of license issuance; and
(d)  any other information the commissioner considers necessary.
(2)  A licensee under this chapter doing business under another name than the
licensee's legal name shall notify the commissioner before using the assumed
name in this state.
